test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v_v3_ise_tarista_gt-norm-dial_Por.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - täristä - ok: # Verb 'to bring' - ok
     täristä+V+Inf: täristä
     täristä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tärisen
     täristä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: täriset
     täristä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tärissee
     täristä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tärisemmä
     täristä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tärisettä
     täristä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: täristhään
     täristä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tärisin
     täristä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tärisit
     täristä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tärisi
     täristä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tärisimmä
     täristä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tärisittä
     täristä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: täristhiin
     täristä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tärissy
     täristä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: täristy
     täristä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: tärisheet
     täristä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: [tärisseevä, tärisevä] # Eira: Por: aukaissee/va ~ aukase/va
     täristä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: [tärisseevät, tärisevät] # Eira: Por: aukaissee/va ~ aukase/va
     täristä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: täristävä
     täristä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: täristävät

     täristä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: tärisisin
     täristä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: tärisisit
     täristä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: tärisis
     täristä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: tärisisimä
     täristä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: tärisisittä
     täristä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: täristäis
     täristä+V+Pass+Cond: täristäis

     täristä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: tärise
     täristä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: täriskää
     
     täristä+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: tärisemässä
     täristä+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: tärisemästä
     täristä+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: tärisemhään
     täristä+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: tärisemälä
     täristä+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: tärisemättä
